Utah statutes.
58-37-7.7.   Use of dedicated credits -- Controlled Substance Database --
Collection of penalties.
(1)  The director may use the monies deposited in the General Fund as a
dedicated credit under Subsections 58-37-6(8)(a), 58-37-7.5(11)(c), and
58-37-7.5(12)(b) for the following purposes:
(a)  maintenance and replacement of the database equipment, including hardware
and software;
(b)  training of staff; and
(c)  pursuit of external grants and matching funds.
(2)  The director of the division may collect any penalty imposed under
Subsections 58-37-6(8)(a), 58-37-7.5(11)(c), and 58-37-7.5(12)(b) and which is
not paid by:
(a)  referring the matter to the Office of State Debt Collection or a
collection agency; or
(b)  bringing an action in the district court of the county in which the
person owing the debt resides or in the county where the office of the
director is located.
(3)  The director may seek legal assistance from the attorney general or the
county or district attorney of the district in which the action is brought to
collect the fine.
(4)  The court shall award reasonable attorney's fees and costs to the
division for successful collection actions under Subsection (2)(b).
(5)  All funding of the controlled substance database as defined under Section
58-37-7.5 is nonlapsing.
